Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5104
Applicability of act.

(1) A domestic insurer holding a certificate of authority to do business in this state shall be subject to the Insurers Investment Act. Except as otherwise provided by law, only investments determined to be authorized investments under the act shall be considered admitted assets for purposes of a domestic insurer's financial statements filed with the director pursuant to section 44-322.

(2) A foreign or alien insurer holding a certificate of authority to do business in this state shall not be subject to the act unless the director notifies such insurer that any of its investments will not be recognized by him or her as an authorized investment for purposes of the act.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 3.